Mississippi, session 2026, HB1225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-3-809, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-3-809.  (1)  Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle, when the driver is giving audible signal by siren, exhaust whistle, or bell, the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the right-of-way and shall immediately drive to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand edge or curb of the roadway clear of any intersection and shall stop and remain in such position until the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, except when otherwise directed by a law enforcement officer. (2)  Upon approaching a stationary authorized emergency vehicle, when such vehicle is giving a signal by use of flashing, blinking, oscillating or rotating lights, as authorized under Section 63-7-19, a person who drives an approaching vehicle shall: (a)  Proceeding with due caution, yield the right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not adjacent to that of the authorized emergency vehicle, if possible with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, if on a roadway having at least four (4) lanes with not less than two (2) lanes proceeding in the same direction as the approaching vehicle; or (b)  Proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for road conditions and being prepared to stop, if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe. (3)  Upon approaching a stationary recovery vehicle, utility service vehicle, sanitation vehicle, or highway maintenance vehicle, when the stationary vehicle is giving a signal by use of authorized flashing lights, a person who drives an approaching vehicle shall: (a)  Proceeding with due caution, yield the right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not adjacent to the stationary vehicle, if possible, with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, if on a roadway having at least four (4) lanes with not less than two (2) lanes proceeding in the same direction as the approaching vehicle; or (b)  Proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for road conditions and being prepared to stop, if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe. (4)  For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise clearly requires: (a)  "Highway maintenance vehicle" means a vehicle used for the maintenance of highways and roadways in this state and is: (i)  Owned or operated by the Department of Transportation, a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state; or (ii)  Owned or operated by a contractor under contract with the Department of Transportation, a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state. (b)  "Recovery vehicle" means a truck that is specifically designed for towing a disabled vehicle or a combination of vehicles. (c)  "Utility service vehicle" means a vehicle used by any person, municipality, county, electric cooperative, corporation, board, commission, district or any entity created or authorized by public act, private act or general law to provide electricity, natural gas, water, wastewater services, telecommunications services or any combination thereof, for sale to consumers in any particular service area, or by any contractor under contract with any such entity. (d)  "Sanitation vehicle" means a vehicle used to collect solid waste, refuse or recyclable material that is: (i)  Owned or operated by a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state; or (ii)  Owned or operated by a contractor under contract with a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state. (5)  Upon approaching a vehicle that is marked with some combination of white flashing strobe or amber and red lights, as provided in Section 63-7-19, that is operated by a United States rural mail carrier for the purpose of delivering United States mail, and that is stationary, including when the vehicle is signaling the intention to enter the roadway, a person who drives an approaching vehicle shall: (a)  Proceeding with due caution, yield the right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not adjacent to the stationary vehicle, if possible, with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, if on a roadway having at least four (4) lanes with not less than two (2) lanes proceeding in the same direction as the approaching vehicle; or (b)  Proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for road conditions and being prepared to stop, if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe. (6)  A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine: (a)  Of not more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00); or (b)  Of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) if violation of this section results in: (i)  Property damage to the emergency vehicle, sanitation vehicle, highway maintenance vehicle, utility service vehicle, recovery vehicle or rural mail carrier vehicle; or (ii)  Bodily injury to the driver or a passenger of any such vehicle. (7)  This section shall not operate to relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle, a sanitation vehicle, a recovery vehicle, a utility service vehicle, a highway maintenance vehicle or a rural mail carrier vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the roadway. SECTION 2.  Section 63-3-915, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-3-915.  A motor vehicle that is located upon private property may not be towed except when authorized by the owner of the motor vehicle, the lienholder of the motor vehicle, the owner of the property upon which the motor vehicle is located or the towing is authorized by other local, state or federal law. SECTION 3.  Section 63-3-1211, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-3-1211.  No person shall throw or deposit upon any highway any glass bottle, glass, nails, tacks, wire, cans, or any other substance likely to injure any person, animal, or vehicle upon such highway. Any person who drops, or permits to be dropped or thrown, upon any highway any destructive or injurious material shall immediately remove the same or cause it to be removed. Any person removing a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway shall remove any glass or other injurious substance dropped upon the highway from such vehicle. SECTION 4.  Section 63-5-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-5-25.  (1)  Every trailer which shall be towed on the public highways at a speed in excess of twenty (20) miles per hour shall be coupled to the towing vehicle by means of a safety chain, chains, cables, or equivalent devices in addition to the regular trailer hitch or coupling.  This requirement does not apply to a semitrailer having a connecting device composed of a fifth wheel and kingpin assembly meeting the requirements of the Interstate Commerce Commission, nor to a pole, pipe, casing, long or piling dolly.  No more slack shall be left in any such safety chains, cables or equivalent devices than shall be necessary to permit proper turning.  The safety chains, cables or equivalent device shall be so connected to the towed and towing vehicles and to the drawbar to prevent the drawbar from dropping to the ground if the drawbar fails, and shall be of sufficient strength to control the trailer in event of failure of the regular trailer hitch or coupling. (2)  When one (1) vehicle is towing another the drawbar or other connection shall be of sufficient strength to pull all weight towed thereby.  Said drawbar or other connection shall not exceed fifteen (15) feet from one (1) vehicle to the other except the connection between any two (2) vehicles transporting poles, pipe, machinery or other objects of structural nature which cannot readily be dismembered. (3)  When one (1) vehicle is towing another and the connection consists of a chain, rope, or cable, there shall be displayed upon such connection a white flag or cloth not less than twelve (12) inches square. (4)  No more than three (3) vehicles in combination shall be towed by saddle-mounts, provided the overall length of the towing and towed vehicles shall not exceed seventy-five (75) feet in length.  No more than one (1) motor vehicle shall be towed by tow bar. SECTION 5.  Section 63-7-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-7-19.  (1)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided for unmarked vehicles under Section 19-25-15 and Section 25-1-87, every police vehicle shall be marked with blue lights.  Every ambulance and special use EMS vehicle as defined in Section 41-59-3 shall be marked with red lights front and back and also may be marked with white and amber lights in addition to red lights.  Every emergency management/civil defense vehicle, including emergency response vehicles of the Department of Environmental Quality, shall be marked with blinking, rotating or oscillating red lights.  Official vehicles of a 911 Emergency Communications District may be marked with red and white lights.  Every wrecker or other vehicle used for emergency work, except vehicles authorized to use blue or red lights, shall be marked with blinking, oscillating or rotating amber-colored lights to warn other vehicles to yield the right-of-way, as provided in Section 63-3-809. Only police vehicles used for emergency work may be marked with blinking, oscillating or rotating blue lights to warn other vehicles to yield the right-of-way.  Only law enforcement vehicles, fire vehicles, private or department-owned vehicles used by firemen of volunteer fire departments which receive funds pursuant to Section 83-1-39 when responding to calls, emergency management/civil defense vehicles, emergency response vehicles of the Department of Environmental Quality, ambulances used for emergency work, and 911 Emergency Communications District vehicles may be marked with blinking, oscillating or rotating red lights to warn other vehicles to yield the right-of-way.  This section shall not apply to school buses carrying lighting devices in accordance with Section 63-7-23. (b)  Emergency response vehicles listed in this subsection (1) are also authorized to use alternating flashing headlights when responding to any emergency. (2)  Any vehicle operated by a United States rural mail carrier for the purpose of delivering United States mail may be marked with two (2) amber-colored lights on front top of the vehicle and two (2) red-colored lights on rear top of the vehicle and alternatively or additionally may be marked with a white, flashing strobe light on the roof of the vehicle so as to warn approaching travelers to decrease their speed because of danger of colliding with the mail carrier as he stops and starts along the edge of the road, street or highway. (3)  Any sanitation vehicle operated by a county, municipality or other political subdivision of this state or by a contractor under contract with a county, municipality or other political subdivision of this state to collect solid waste, refuse or recyclable material may be marked with flashing or oscillating white- or amber-colored lights so as to warn approaching travelers to decrease speed because of the danger of colliding with the sanitation collection vehicle as it stops and starts along the road, street or highway. (4)  Any nonlaw enforcement vehicle being used to lead and facilitate the movement of a military funeral procession may be marked with blinking, rotating or oscillating purple lights. "Military funeral procession" means two (2) or more vehicles accompanying the body of a deceased member of the United States Armed Forces, or traveling to the church, chapel or other location at which the funeral service or entombment is to be held. (5)  Any operator of an emergency vehicle authorized to be marked with blinking, rotating or oscillating lights in accordance with this section, shall use blinking, rotating or oscillating lights when operating the emergency vehicle at a speed in excess of thirty (30) miles per hour over the posted speed limit. SECTION 6.  Section 63-7-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-7-49.  Means for establishing electric connection between towing and towed vehicles, and other detachable electric connections, shall be mechanically and electrically adequate, and free of short or open circuits. Suitable provision shall be made in every detachable connection to afford reasonable assurance against accidental disconnection. Precaution shall be taken to provide sufficient slack in the connecting wire or cable without twisting or kinking thereof. SECTION 7.  Section 63-23-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-23-5.  (1)  Any automobile dealer, wrecker service, or repair service owner, or any person or party on whose property a motor vehicle is lawfully towed at the written request of a law enforcement officer, who shall have an abandoned motor vehicle on his property, may sell, free and clear of all claims such motor vehicle by public auction, or if the abandoned motor vehicle has no market value, may dispose of the same after having received at least two (2) written statements from licensed automobile dealers as to the worthlessness of such motor vehicle and after compliance with subsection (2) of this section and Section 63-23-9. An abandoned motor vehicle as defined by Section 63-23-3(b) shall not be sold at auction until thirty (30) days from date of removal from a public street, road or highway. (2)  The person authorized to execute the sale or disposal of an abandoned motor vehicle shall notify, within ten (10) days of receipt of such vehicle, any Mississippi lienholder on such vehicle that unless a claim on the vehicle is made within thirty (30) days of such notice, the vehicle will be sold or destroyed. (3)  After the sale of any vehicle as set out hereinabove is made, the person or officer designated and making the sale of such property shall promptly upon completion of the sale deliver to the chancery clerk a list or itemization of the property sold, the amount paid for each item, the person to whom each item was sold, and all monies received from such sale, the gross charges levied by the person making the sale against the property sold and the net amount paid over to the chancery clerk. Any sale made by any person, officer, corporation or association, shall have attached to the report of sale a sworn statement certifying as to the date such personal property or items sold first came into his possession or was abandoned on his premises and the date said personal property or item was sold. (4)  The proceeds of the sale in excess of repair, towing and storage expenses and all expenses incurred in connection with a sale when a sale is made under the provisions of this chapter, shall escheat to the county and shall be paid over to the chancery clerk to be placed into the general fund of the county in which the vehicle is abandoned.  However, in those municipalities availing themselves of the provisions of Section 21-39-21, the proceeds of the sale in excess of the repairs, towing, storage or other necessary expenses incurred shall escheat to the general fund of the municipality. SECTION 8.  Section 63-23-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-23-7.  Prior to disposition of an abandoned motor vehicle any automobile dealer, wrecker service or repair service owner, or any person on whose property such a vehicle is lawfully towed at the written request of a law enforcement officer, shall inquire of the * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue as to status of the vehicle in regard to the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law.  Said inquiry shall provide the description of the vehicle including the vehicle identification number.  Upon request of the * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue, satisfactory evidence must be furnished as to abandonment in compliance with this chapter.  Upon receipt of notification of the foregoing, the * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue shall advise any automobile dealer, wrecker service or repair service owner, or any person on whose property such a vehicle is lawfully towed at the written request of a law enforcement officer, of proper titling procedures, where indicated, depending upon method of disposition of the vehicle. SECTION 9.  Section 63-37-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-37-1.  For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings, unless context clearly provides otherwise: (a)  "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle which self-propels, and is intended primarily for use and operation on public roads and highways. (b)  "Nonconsensual towing" means the moving, transporting or recovery of a commercial vehicle by a towing and recovery service without the prior consent or authorization of the owner or operator of the motor vehicle from private property and/or by police-initiated towing. (c)  "Towing" means the moving, transporting or recovery from public or private property, or from a storage facility of a person's commercial motor vehicle, the moving or removing of an unclaimed commercial vehicle, or the immobilization of or preparation for moving or removing of the commercial motor vehicle, for which a fee is charged either directly or indirectly. (d)  Heavy-duty towing shall be the towing of a vehicle, including trailers and semitrailers, with a gross vehicle rating over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. (e)  Medium-duty towing shall be the towing of a vehicle, including trailers and semitrailers with a gross vehicle rating of over fifteen thousand (15,000) pounds to twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. (f)  "Towing and recovery service" means an individual or business entity that provides towing and recovery services at the direction of a law enforcement officer or private property owner in exchange for a fee or charge. (g)  "Law enforcement officer" means any law enforcement public servant and/or State Highway Patrol Officer. (h)  "Tow list" means a list of approved towing companies compiled, maintained and utilized by a law enforcement officer or his or her designee, and as authorized by the Department of Public Safety to perform police-initiated towing services of disabled or abandoned commercial motor vehicles. (i)  "Police initiated towing" means towing of a commercial motor vehicle which was authorized, requested or dispatched by a law enforcement officer. (j)  "Vehicle immobilization device" means a mechanical device that is designated or adapted to be attached to a wheel, tire or other part of a parked commercial motor vehicle to prohibit the vehicle's usual manner of movement or operation. (k)  "Per pound billing" means a method of calculating a fee for towing using a formula that considers the weight of the commercial motor vehicle, equipment or cargo that is the subject of the towing and multiplies the weight of the vehicle, equipment or cargo by a monetary amount. (l)  "Drop fee" means a fee that a towing and recovery service charges to unhook a commercial motor vehicle from a tow truck. (m)  "Cargo" means goods and materials transported by a commercial motor vehicle as defined in 49 CFR Section 390.5, including, without limitation: (i)  Pallets; (ii)  Containers; (iii)  Bracing; (iv)  Air pillows; (v)  Tie-down assemblies and other securement systems; (vi)  Cradles; (vii)  Chocks; and (viii)  All other dunnage and packaging. (n)  "Commercial vehicle" means any self-propelled or motored device designed to be used or used primarily for the transportation of passengers or property, or both, and have a gross vehicular weight rating of fifteen thousand (15,000) pounds or more. SECTION 10.  Section 63-37-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-37-3.  (1)  The Department of Public Safety, Public Commercial Transportation Enforcement Division, shall create within the department a "Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee."  The Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee shall consist of the following members: (a)  The Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, or his or her designee; (b)  The Director of the Mississippi Highway Patrol (Assistant Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety), or his or her designee; (c)  Two (2) members, the President of the Mississippi Towing Association, and his or her appointee, to represent the towing and recovery services within the state; (d)  Two (2) members, appointed by the President of the Mississippi Trucking Association, to represent the commercial motor carriers within the state; and (e)  One (1) member, appointed by the Governor, to represent the local police jurisdictions. (2)  Members of the Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee shall serve for a term of two (2) years.  Members may serve consecutive terms.  Members shall serve without compensation. (3)  At the first meeting, the Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee shall elect a chairperson from its membership to serve for a term of two (2) years.  A chairperson may serve consecutive terms. (4)  The Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee shall hold its first meeting no later than September 1, 2024, at a time and location within the state to be determined by the Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety.  Thereafter, meetings shall be held on dates and at times and locations within the state and selected by the chairperson in consultation with the other members or by the Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, if the most recent chairperson's term has expired. (5)  The Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee shall keep and maintain a record of all proceedings of the Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee, and copies of all orders and/or recommendations issued by the Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee. SECTION 11.  Section 63-37-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-37-5.  The Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee shall: (a)  Establish regulations and standards for the inclusion of a towing and recovery service on the tow list, including application procedures and minimum qualification requirements; (b)  Establish statewide maximum towing and storage rates for nonconsensual tows, including those for private property.  The established maximum rates shall include maximum rates for administrative fees, provided as follows: (i)  A towing and recovery service may charge less than, but may not charge more than the approved statewide rates; (ii)  The towing and recovery service shall not charge or retain any fees not indicated by the committee for the maximum rates for towing and storage of a commercial motor vehicle after the nonconsensual tow from private property; and (iii)  The statewide maximum towing and storage rates for nonconsensual tows shall be reviewed annually.  Market fluctuations within the towing industry may be considered along with current consensual towing market rates and their relationship to nonconsensual towing rates; (c)  Require the towing and recovery service to ban the use of per-pound billing for nonconsensual towing; (d)  Publish a Towing Service Standard Manual, with rules governing the use of towing and recovery services for nonconsensually towing of commercial vehicles no later than January 1, 2025.  At a minimum, the rules shall include the following provisions to: (i)  Establish the information required to be included on any invoice associated with the towing of a commercial motor vehicle, including, but not limited to, requiring that the invoice be itemized; (ii)  Establish factors that shall be considered in determining whether a charge levied by a towing and recovery service is fair, equitable and reasonable; (iii)  Establish a process the committee shall use to receive, investigate and adjudicate complaints against a towing and recovery service; (iv)  Establish a service charge dispute resolution process that includes, at a minimum, provisions requiring completion of a written complaint form, deadlines for initiating a complaint after receiving an itemized invoice, deadlines for responding to a complaint, cessation of storage fees during the complaint resolution process, a hearing on the complaint and deadlines for issuing a formal decision adjudicating the service charge dispute; (v)  Establish an appeals process for the appeal of any determination of order of the committee under this subsection; (vi)  Establish a disciplinary procedure for violations of the rules by the towing and recovery service, including the suspension or removal of a towing and recovery service from the tow list; and (vii)  Establish a process that the Department of Public Safety may use to suspend or remove a towing and recovery service from any tow list. SECTION 12.  Section 63-37-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-37-7.  (1)  Upon nonconsensual towing and recovery of a commercial towing vehicle and movement of the commercial motor vehicle to a storage facility, a towing and recovery service shall allow an owner of a commercial motor vehicle or a designee of the owner of the commercial motor vehicle to access the vehicle in a reasonable manner as established by rules adopted by the Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee.  Any vehicle towed nonconsensually in Mississippi must be stored in the State of Mississippi. (2)  The towing and recovery services shall provide a commercial vehicle owner or operator or owner's designee with reasonable access to the vehicle so that the vehicle owner and operator or the owner's designee may access and collect any personal property contained in the vehicle, regardless of whether any payment has been made for the towing and recovery service charges. (3)  If there is no dispute as to the charges assessed by the towing and recovery service for the nonconsensual towing of the commercial motor vehicle, the vehicle owner or operator or the owner's designee shall pay the towing service invoice and the towing and recovery service shall release the vehicle immediately. SECTION 13.  Section 63-37-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-37-9.  In authorizing a towing and recovery service to perform towing services, any law enforcement officer may utilize the services of a tow list, provided: (a)  They are under no obligation to include or retain the services of any towing and recovery service in any contract or agreement with respect to any tow list established pursuant to this subsection.  A towing and recovery service is subject to removal from a towing list at any time; and (b)  An owner or operator of a commercial motor vehicle may request a specific towing and recovery service and that request shall be honored by the law enforcement officer unless the requested towing and recovery service cannot perform the requested towing and recovery service or does not respond in a reasonable time, as determined by the law enforcement officer. SECTION 14.  Section 63-37-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-37-11.  (1)  It shall be unlawful for: (a)  A law enforcement officer to: (i)  Receive compensation or receive any other incentive, monetary or otherwise, to select a particular towing and recovery service from the list; (ii)  Hold any financial interest in a towing and recovery service; and (iii)  Recommend any towing and recovery service in the performance of his or her duties; (b)  Any member of the Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee or Department of Transportation to receive compensation from a towing and recovery service for the privilege of being included on the tow list; (c)  A towing and recovery service to pay money or other valuable consideration for the privilege of nonconsensual towing commercial motor vehicles; and (d)  A towing and recovery service to employ or otherwise compensate individuals, commonly referred to as "spotters," whose primary task is to report the presence of unauthorized, improperly or illegally parked commercial motor vehicles for the purpose of towing or removal and storage * * *; and. (2)  Nonconsensual tows for unauthorized, illegally parked commercial motor vehicles on private property must be performed by Mississippi-based towers.  Towed vehicles must be stored within the State of Mississippi. SECTION 15.  Section 63-37-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-37-13.  (1)  (a)  Before a towing and recovery service connects a commercial motor vehicle to a tow truck for a nonconsensual tow, the towing and recovery service shall document the vehicle's condition and the reason for the tow by: (i)  Taking at least four (4) photographs of the vehicle, with at least one (1) photograph taken from the front, one (1) photograph taken from the rear, one (1) photograph taken from the driver's side and one (1) taken from the passenger's side.  These photographs must: 1.  Show the entire vehicle from the required angle; and 2.  Have the vehicle fill at least three-fourths (3/4) of the photograph, measured from side to side; and (ii)  Taking a photograph that shows the reason the vehicle is being towed nonconsensually. The photograph must show the portion of the vehicle in relation to the reason, including any sign that the vehicle was towed. (b)  Upon demand of the owner or operator of the commercial motor vehicle or the owner's designee, the Department of Transportation or the Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee, the towing and recovery service shall provide copies of the photographs. (c)  A towing and recovery service's failure to produce the photographs shall create a rebuttable presumption that the towing and recovery service did not have the authority to tow a vehicle from either a private property owner or operator or a law enforcement officer. (2)  Before a towing and recovery service connects a commercial motor vehicle to a tow truck for a nonconsensual tow, the towing and recovery service shall have authorization to nonconsensually tow a commercial motor vehicle.  Authorization shall be found if: (a)  A law enforcement officer requests a police-initiated tow and requests that a towing and recovery service from the tow list provide towing; or (b)  The towing and recovery service has received permission to tow the commercial motor vehicle from the owner of the private property. A towing service shall not tow a commercial motor vehicle from private property without the owner or operator of the private property giving the tower service written permission. (c)  In order for the towing and recovery service to conduct a nonconsensual tow, the private property owner must have posted signage visible and facing the driver at each entryway into the property stating that vehicles parked on the property without authorization or inappropriately or illegally parked are subject to being towed.  The sign must also contain the international towing symbol no smaller than four (4) inches by four (4) inches and be permanently mounted in a position that is no lower than five (5) feet and no higher than eight (8) feet. (3)  The towing and recovery service shall not assess a drop fee to release the commercial motor vehicle after the vehicle is hooked up to the tow truck but before the vehicle is removed from the private property. SECTION 16.  Section 63-37-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-37-15.  A towing and recovery service shall not use vehicle immobilization devices except under the direction of law enforcement. SECTION 17.  Section 83-11-301, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-11-301.  (1)  An automobile insurance policy shall not be construed to allow an insurer to assume or accede to the legal title of a motor vehicle without assuming credit obligations of the insured owner of the motor vehicle for reasonable and customary charges for towing and storage services associated with the incident from which the insurance coverage arises. (2)  An insurer which has succeeded to the title of a motor vehicle is not authorized to abandon such vehicle to a towing or storage service without consent of the provider of such service. (3)  (a)  A debt incurred by or on behalf of a named insured for towing or storage services may be collected from an insurer which succeeds to the legal title of the motor vehicle covered under the policy for physical damage, property damage or uninsured motorist coverage. (b)  An insurer may be authorized by the provisions of an automobile insurance policy to act for a named insured in any matter regarding the towing and storage of a covered disabled vehicle. SECTION 18.  Section 85-7-251, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 85-7-251.  (1)  The owner of a motor vehicle that has been towed at his request or at the direction of a law enforcement officer, or towed upon request of a real property owner upon whose property a vehicle has been left without permission of the real property owner, shall be liable for the reasonable price of towing and storage of such vehicle; and the towing company to whom the price of such labor and storage costs may be due shall have the right to retain possession of such motor vehicle until the price is paid. (2)  Within twenty-four (24) hours, the towing company shall report to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction any vehicle that has been towed unless the vehicle was towed at the request of the owner of the vehicle.  If the owner of a towed vehicle has not contacted the towing company within five (5) business days of the initial tow, the towing company shall obtain from the appropriate authority the names and addresses of any owner and lienholder.  If the information from the appropriate authority fails to disclose the owner or lienholder, a good faith effort shall be made by the towing company to locate ownership, including a check for tag information, inspection sticker, or any papers in the vehicle that may indicate ownership.  Upon location of the owner and lienholder, the towing company shall notify them by registered mail of the amount due for towing, postmarked no later than the tenth day following the initial tow.  If such amount shall not be paid within thirty (30) days from the initial tow, the towing company to whom such charges are payable shall notify by certified mail any legal owner and holder of any lien, as disclosed by the motor vehicle title records or other investigation, of notice of sale of the property.  If such property has not been redeemed within ten (10) days after the mailing of the certified letter, the towing company may commence sale of the property at public auction.  The towing company shall publish for two (2) consecutive weeks a notice of sale in the newspaper having circulation in the county where the vehicle was initially towed.  The proceeds of the sale of such property in excess of the amount needed to pay the towing, reasonable storage and necessary expenses of the procedures required by this section shall be held by the towing company for a period of six (6) months, and, if not reclaimed by the owner thereof within such time, shall become the property of the county and be paid to the chancery clerk of the county in which the sale was held to be deposited into the county general fund, subject, however, to any rights of the recorded lienholder. (3)  The failure to make a good faith effort to comply with the requirements of this section shall preclude the imposition of any storage charges or towing charges against the towed vehicle. (4)  Every towing company shall maintain accurate records for a period of three (3) years, which records shall identify the vehicles it has towed and stored and all procedures that it has taken to comply with the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 19.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.